Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,138
Abandonment of a nonprofit conversion.

(MBCA 9.35) (a) Unless
otherwise provided in a plan of nonprofit conversion of a domestic business
corporation, after the plan has been adopted and approved as required by sections
21-2,133 to 21-2,138, and at any time before the nonprofit conversion has
become effective, it may be abandoned by the board of directors without action
by the shareholders.

(b) If a nonprofit
conversion is abandoned under subsection (a) of this section after articles
of nonprofit conversion or articles of charter surrender have been filed with
the Secretary of State but before the nonprofit conversion has become effective,
a statement that the nonprofit conversion has been abandoned in accordance
with this section, signed by an officer or other duly authorized representative,
shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing prior to the effective
date of the nonprofit conversion. The statement shall take effect upon filing
and the nonprofit conversion shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become
effective.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 138.
January 1, 2017